North Carolina statutes. Chapter 8C. Evidence Code.
Article 1. General Provisions.

Rule 101.
Scope.

These rules govern proceedings in the courts of this State to the extent and with the exceptions stated in Rule 1101.

History.

1983, ch. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule differs from Fed. R. Evid. 101 only in that “courts of this State” has been substituted for “courts of the United States and before United States magistrates.” Rule 1101 provides greater details regarding the applicability of these rules in various proceedings.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1983 law of evidence, see 62 N.C.L. Rev. 1290 (1984).

For article, “An Analysis of the New North Carolina Evidence Code,” see 20 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1 (1984).

For note on the future of character impeachment in North Carolina, in light of State v. Jean,

310 N.C. 157

, 311 S.E.2d 266 (1984), see 63 N.C.L. Rev. 535 (1985).

For article, “Silence, Confessions, and the New Accuracy Imperative,” see 65 Duke L.J. 697 (2016).

Rule 102.
Purpose and construction.

In general. — These rules shall be construed to secure fairness in administration, elimination of unjustifiable expense and delay, and promotion of growth and development of the law of evidence to the end that the truth may be ascertained and proceedings justly determined.

Subordinate divisions. — For the purpose of these rules only, the subordinate division of any rule which is labeled with a lower case letter shall be a subdivision.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule differs from Fed. R. Evid. 102 by the addition of subdivision (b) which is explained below. The commentary to each rule indicates whether the rule is identical to or different from its counterpart in the federal rules. The intent is to make applicable, as an aid in construction, the federal decisional law construing identical or similar provisions of the Federal Rules of Evidence.

Of course, federal precedents are not binding on the courts of this State in construing these rules. Nonetheless, these rules are not adopted in a vacuum. A substantial body of law construing these rules exists and should be looked to by the courts for enlightenment and guidance in ascertaining the intent of the General Assembly in adopting these rules. Uniformity of evidence rulings in the courts of this State and federal courts is one motivating factor in adopting these rules and should be a goal of our courts in construing those rules that are identical.

Problems of construction may arise that have not been settled by federal precedents. In these instances, our courts should examine North Carolina cases as well as federal cases for enlightenment.

Although these rules answer the vast majority of evidence questions that arise in our courts, there are some evidentiary questions that are not within the coverage of these rules. In these instances, North Carolina precedents will continue to control unless changed by our courts.

The commentary to each rule indicates whether the rule is consistent with current North Carolina practice. The discussion of North Carolina law is included to highlight the changes made by these rules.

Wherever the commentary refers to “the Advisory Committee’s Note”, the reference is to the Advisory Committee on Rules of Evidence appointed by United States Chief Justice Warren on March 8, 1965. See Saltzburg and Redden,
Federal Rules of Evidence Manual,
p. 2-4 (3d ed. 1982).

Rule 102 provides that these rules shall be construed to promote growth and development of the law of evidence. Of course, this provision is not intended to give discretion to construe the rules unfettered by the language of the rules. Rather, the language of Rule 102 permits a flexible approach to problems not explicitly covered by the rules.

Subdivision (b) was added to this rule to make it clear that the scheme of subordinate divisions being followed is that of the federal rules. The North Carolina statutory scheme would term the subordinate divisions referred to as “subsections.” It was felt by the drafters of the North Carolina rules and commentary that following the federal scheme would avoid confusion in comparing the federal rules to the North Carolina rules and in applying authorities which refer to the federal rules.

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “Making Waves in a Sea of Uncertainty: Howerton Muddies the Waters of Expert Testimony Admissibility Standards in North Carolina,” see 83 N.C. L. Rev. 1613 (2005).

For article, “The Emotional Woman,” see 99 N.C.L. Rev. 1027 (2021).

Rule 103.
Rulings on evidence.

Effect of erroneous ruling. — Error may not be predicated upon a ruling which admits or excludes evidence unless a substantial right of the party is affected, and

Objection. — In case the ruling is one admitting evidence, a timely objection or motion to strike appears of record. No particular form is required in order to preserve the right to assert the alleged error upon appeal if the motion or objection clearly presented the alleged error to the trial court;

Offer of proof. — In case the ruling is one excluding evidence, the substance of the evidence was made known to the court by offer or was apparent from the context within which questions were asked.

Once the court makes a definitive ruling on the record admitting or excluding evidence, either at or before trial, a party need not renew an objection or offer of proof to preserve a claim of error for appeal.

Record of offer and ruling. — The court may add any other or further statement which shows the character of the evidence, the form in which it was offered, the objection made, and the ruling thereon. It may direct the making of an offer in question and answer form.

Hearing of jury. — In jury cases, proceedings shall be conducted, to the extent practicable, so as to prevent inadmissible evidence from being suggested to the jury by any means, such as making statements or offers of proof or asking questions in the hearing of the jury.

Review of errors where justice requires. — Notwithstanding the requirements of subdivision (a) of this rule, an appellate court may review errors affecting substantial rights if it determines, in the interest of justice, it is appropriate to do so.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1; 2003-101, s. 1; 2006-264, s. 30.5.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 103, except for subsection (1) of subdivision (a), and subdivision (d).

Subdivision (a) adopts the “substantial rights” language used in the majority of states in testing for harmless error. North Carolina Civ. Pro. Rule 61 provides that no error is grounds for reversal unless the error amounts to the denial of a substantial right. Subdivision (a) is not intended to affect the additional requirement in criminal cases that a reasonable possibility exist that a different result would have been reached if the error had not been committed. See

G.S. 15A-1443

.

Subdivision (a) also provides that rulings on evidence cannot be assigned as error unless the nature of the error was called to the attention of the judge, so as to alert him to the proper course of action and enable opposing counsel to take proper corrective measures. This is in accord with North Carolina practice. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 27, at 107 (1982);

G.S. 15A-1446

. The wording of subsection (1) differs from the federal rule by borrowing the language of

G.S. 15A-1446

(a) to describe the minimum requirements of an objection or motion to strike.

The provisions of subdivision (b) are substantially the same as current North Carolina practice. North Carolina Civ. Pro. Rule 43(c) and G.S. 15A-1446(a) should be amended where necessary to conform to Rule 103.

Subdivision (c) is in accord with North Carolina practice.

Subdivision (d) differs from Fed. R. Evid. 103(d). The federal rule provides that, although an error was not brought to the court’s attention (as required by subdivision (a)), the court may nevertheless review “plain error affecting substantial rights.” Subdivision (d) of this rule borrows its language from G.S. 15A-1446(b), which applies in criminal proceedings, and makes that the standard for both criminal and civil proceedings, but with the addition that “substantial rights” must be affected. This represents an expansion of the areas in civil cases in which North Carolina appellate courts may review error where no proper objection or motion was previously made. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 27 (1982).

It is anticipated that in civil cases appellate courts will rarely exercise the authority to take notice of errors that were not brought to the attention of the trial court. G.S. 15A-1446(b) should be amended to reflect the adoption of Rule 103(d).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-264, s. 30.5, effective August 27, 2006, transferred the last sentence in subdivision (a)(2) to the last paragraph of subsection (a).

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Recent Developments: State v. Hinnant: Limiting the Medical Treatment Hearsay Exception in Child Sexual Abuse Cases,” see 79 N.C.L. Rev. 1089 (2001).

For recent development, “The Supreme Court of North Carolina’s Rulemaking Authority and the Struggle for Power: State v. Tutt,” see 84 N.C. L. Rev. 2100 (2006).

Rule 104.
Preliminary questions.

Questions of admissibility generally. — Preliminary questions concerning the qualification of a person to be a witness, the existence of a privilege, or the admissibility of evidence shall be determined by the court, subject to the provisions of subdivision (b). In making its determination it is not bound by the rules of evidence except those with respect to privileges.

Relevancy conditioned on fact. — When the relevancy of evidence depends upon the fulfillment of a condition of fact, the court shall admit it upon, or subject to, the introduction of evidence sufficient to support a finding of the fulfillment of the condition.

Hearing of jury. — Hearings on the admissibility of confessions or other motions to suppress evidence in criminal trials in Superior Court shall in all cases be conducted out of the hearing of the jury. Hearings on other preliminary matters shall be so conducted when the interests of justice require or, when an accused is a witness, if he so requests.

Testimony by accused. — The accused does not, by testifying upon a preliminary matter, subject himself to cross-examination as to other issues in the case.

Weight and credibility. — This rule does not limit the right of a party to introduce before the jury evidence relevant to weight or credibility.

History.

1983, ch. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 104 with the exception of subdivision (c) which is discussed below.

Subdivision (a) states as a general rule that preliminary questions shall be determined by the judge. This is in accord with North Carolina practice. See H. Brandis,
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 8 (1982). The Advisory Committee’s Note to the federal rule states:

“The applicability of a particular rule of evidence often depends upon the existence of a condition. Is the alleged expert a qualified physician? Is a witness whose former testimony is offered unavailable? Was a stranger present during a conversation between attorney and client? In each instance the admissibility of evidence will turn upon the answer to the question of the existence of the condition. Accepted practice, incorporated in the rule, places on the judge the responsibility for these determinations. McCormick § 53; Morgan, Basic Problems of Evidence 45-50 (1962).

To the extent that these inquiries are factual, the judge acts as a trier of fact. Often, however, rulings on evidence call for an evaluation in terms of a legally set standard. Thus when a hearsay statement is offered as a declaration against interest, a decision must be made whether it possesses the required against-interest characteristics. These decisions, too, are made by the judge.

In view of these considerations, this subdivision refers to preliminary requirements generally by the broad term ‘question,’ without attempt at specification.

This subdivision is of general application. It must, however, be read as subject to the special provisions for ‘conditional relevancy’ in subdivision (b) and those for confessions in subdivision (d).”

The second sentence of subdivision (a) provides that in making its determination on preliminary questions, the court is not bound by the rules of evidence except those with respect to privileges. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“If the question is factual in nature, the judge will of necessity receive evidence pro and con on the issue. The rule provides that the rules of evidence in general do not apply to this process. McCormick § 53, p. 123, n. 8, points out that the authorities are ‘scattered and inconclusive,’ and observes:

‘Should the exclusionary law of evidence, “the child of the jury system” in Thayer’s phrase, be applied to this hearing before the judge? Sound sense backs the view that it should not, and that the judge should be empowered to hear any relevant evidence, such as affidavits or other reliable hearsay.’

This view is reinforced by practical necessity in certain situations. An item, offered and objected to, may itself be considered in ruling on admissibility, though not yet admitted in evidence. Thus the content of an asserted declaration against interest must be considered in ruling whether it is against interest. * * * Another example is the requirement of Rule 602 dealing with personal knowledge. In the case of hearsay, it is enough, if the declarant ‘so far as appears [has] had an opportunity to observe the fact declared’. McCormick § 10, p. 19.

If concern is felt over the use of affidavits by the judge in preliminary hearings on admissibility, attention is directed to the many important judicial determinations made on the basis of affidavits. * * *

The rules of Civil Procedure are more detailed. Rule 43(e), dealing with motions generally, provides:

‘ When a motion is based on facts not appearing of record the court may hear the matter on affidavits presented by the respective parties, but the court may direct that the matter be heard wholly or partly on oral testimony or depositions.’

. . . Rule 56 provides in detail for the entry of summary judgment based on affidavits. Affidavits may supply the foundation for temporary restraining orders under Rule 65(b).”

Subdivision (b) concerns relevancy conditioned on fact. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“In some situations, the relevancy of an item of evidence, in the large sense, depends upon the existence of a particular preliminary fact. Thus when a spoken statement is relied upon to prove notice to X, it is without probative value unless X heard it. Or if a letter purporting to be from Y is relied upon to establish an admission by him, it has no probative value unless Y wrote or authorized it. Relevance in this sense has been labelled ‘conditional relevancy’. Morgan, Basic Problems of Evidence 45-46 (1962). Problems arising in connection with it are to be distinguished from problems of logical relevancy, e.g., evidence in a murder case that accused on the day before purchased a weapon of the kind used in the killing, treated in Rule 401.

If preliminary questions of conditional relevancy were determined solely by the judge, as provided in subdivision (1), the functioning of the jury as a trier of fact would be greatly restricted and in some cases virtually destroyed. These are appropriate questions for juries. Accepted treatment, as provided in the rule, is consistent with that given fact questions generally. The judge makes a preliminary determination whether the foundation evidence is sufficient to support a finding of fulfillment of the condition. If so, the item is admitted. If after all the evidence on the issue is in, pro and con, the jury could reasonably conclude that fulfillment of the condition is not established, the issue is for them. If the evidence is not such as to allow a finding, the judge withdraws the matter from their consideration. * * *

The order of proof here, as generally, is subject to the control of the judge.”

Subdivision (b) is in accord with North Carolina practice in making an exception to the general rule that preliminary questions are for the court. When the relevancy of evidence depends upon the existence of some other fact which also requires proof, the determination of the preliminary fact question is for the jury.
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 8, p. 27-28 (1982).

Subdivision (c) concerns when hearings on preliminary questions will be out of the hearing of the jury. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Preliminary hearings on the admissibility of confessions must be conducted outside the hearing of the jury. See Jackson v. Denno, 378 U.S. 368, 84 S. Ct. 1774, 12 L. Ed. 2d. 908 (1964). Otherwise, detailed treatment of when preliminary matters should be heard outside the hearing of the jury is not feasible. The procedure is time consuming. Not infrequently the same evidence which is relevant to the issue of establishment of fulfillment of a condition precedent to admissibility is also relevant to weight or credibility, and time is saved by taking foundation proof in the presence of the jury. Much evidence on preliminary questions, though not relevant to jury issues, may be heard by the jury with no adverse effect. A great deal must be left to the discretion of the judge who will act as the interests of justice require.”

Subdivision (c) has been changed from the federal rule by the addition of language requiring other motions to suppress evidence in criminal cases in superior court to be conducted out of the hearing of the jury. This is in accord with

G.S. 15A-977(e)

which should be amended to reflect the adoption of this rule.

Subdivision (d) provides that the accused does not, by testifying upon a preliminary matter, subject himself to cross-examination as to other issues in the case. As the Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The limitation upon cross-examination is designed to encourage participation by the accused in the determination of preliminary matters. He may testify concerning them without exposing himself to cross-examination generally. The provision is necessary because of the breadth of cross-examination under Rule 611(b).

The rule does not address itself to questions of the subsequent use of testimony given by an accused at a hearing on a preliminary matter. See Walder v. United States, 347 U.S. 62 (1954); Simmons v. United States, 390 U.S. 377 (1968); Harris v. New York, 401 U.S. 222 (1971).”

There are no North Carolina cases on this point.

Subdivision (e) makes it clear that after the court makes its determination on a preliminary question of fact, the party opposing the ruling is entitled to introduce before the jury evidence that relates to the weight or credibility of certain evidence. For example, even if the court determines that a confession was not coerced, the defendant may introduce evidence of coercion, since this is relevant to the weight of the evidence.

Subdivision (e) is in accord with North Carolina practice.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The Admissibility of Expert Testimony in North Carolina After Howerton: Reconciling the Ruling with the Rules of Evidence,” see 28 Campbell L. Rev. 1 (2005).

Rule 105.
Limited admissibility.

When evidence which is admissible as to one party or for one purpose but not admissible as to another party or for another purpose is admitted, the court, upon request, shall restrict the evidence to its proper scope and instruct the jury accordingly.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 105. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“A close relationship exists between this rule and Rule 403 which requires exclusion when ‘probative value is substantially outweighed by the danger of unfair prejudice, confusion of the issues, or misleading the jury.’ The present rule recognizes the practice of admitting evidence for a limited purpose and instructing the jury accordingly. The availability and effectiveness of this practice must be taken into consideration in reaching a decision whether to exclude for unfair prejudice under Rule 403. In Bruton v. United States, 389 U.S. 818, 88 S. Ct. 126, 19 L. Ed. 2d. 70 (1968), the Court ruled that a limiting instruction did not effectively protect the accused against the prejudicial effect of admitting in evidence the confession of a codefendant which implicated him. The decision does not, however, bar the use of limited admissibility with an instruction where the risk of prejudice is less serious.”

Rule 105 is in accord with the general rule in North Carolina that evidence that is inadmissible for one purpose may be admitted for other and proper purposes. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 79 (1982).

Legal Periodicals.

For articles, “A Six Step Analysis of ‘Other Purposes’ Evidence Pursuant to Rule 404(b) of the North Carolina Rules of Evidence,” see 21 N.C. Cent. L.J. 1 (1995).

Rule 106.
Remainder of or related writings or recorded statements.

When a writing or recorded statement or part thereof is introduced by a party, an adverse party may require him at that time to introduce any other part or any other writing or recorded statement which ought in fairness to be considered contemporaneously with it.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 106. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The rule is an expression of the rule of completeness. McCormick § 56. It is manifested as to depositions in Rule 32(a) (4) of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure, of which the proposed rule is substantially a restatement.

The rule is based on two considerations. The first is the misleading impression created by taking matters out of context. The second is the inadequacy of repair work when delayed to a point later in the trial. * * * The rule does not in any way circumscribe the right of the adversary to develop the matter on cross-examination or as part of his own case.

For practical reasons, the rule is limited to writings and recorded statements and does not apply to conversations.”

N.C. Civ. Pro. Rule 32(a) (5), which applies to depositions, is similar to Rule 106.